Utah statutes.
63G-6-703 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Selection as part of design-build or lease.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, architect-engineer services may be procured under Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, as part of the services obtained in a design-build contract or as part of the services obtained in a lease contract for real property, provided that the qualifications of those providing the architect-engineer services are part of the consideration in the selection process.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

